Louisiana, session 2026, HB829.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301 through 3307 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70. LOUISIANA MINORITY BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT FUND
§3301. Legislative findings and purpose
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(1) Minority-owned businesses in this state face systemic barriers to capital
access, including discriminatory lending practices, lower collateral asset bases
resulting from historical wealth exclusion, and lack of access to traditional financial
networks.
(2) The racial wealth gap in this state is a direct consequence of historically
sanctioned discrimination in employment, housing, and business ownership, and
represents an ongoing economic harm to the state.
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 829
(3) Access to affordable capital is the single most significant factor limiting
the formation and growth of minority-owned small businesses.
(4) State investment in minority business development yields measurable
returns through tax revenue generation, job creation, and community wealth
building.
B. It is therefore the purpose of this Chapter to establish the Louisiana
Minority Business Development Fund as a revolving loan fund to provide accessible,
low-interest financing to qualified minority-owned businesses throughout the state.
§3302. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Department" means Louisiana Economic Development.
(2) "Eligible business" means a for-profit business entity that does all of the
following:
(a) Is majority-owned, more than fifty percent, by one or more minority
persons.
(b) Has been in operation for at least twelve consecutive months prior to
application, except as provided in R.S. 51:3304(D).
(c) Employs fifty or fewer full-time equivalent employees.
(d) Has annual gross revenues of five million dollars or less in the preceding
fiscal year.
(e) Is registered and in good standing with the secretary of state.
(f) Is current on all state and local tax obligations or is in an approved
repayment plan.
(3) "Fund" means the Louisiana Minority Business Development Fund
established pursuant to R.S. 51:3303.
(4) "Minority person" means an individual who is a citizen or lawful
permanent resident of the United States and who is a member of one of the following
groups:
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 829
(a) African American or Black, a person having origins in any of the Black
racial groups of Africa.
(b) Hispanic American, a person of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban,
Dominican, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or
origin.
(c) Asian Pacific American, a person having origins in any of the original
peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific
Islands.
(d) Native American, a person having origins in any of the original peoples
of North America and maintaining cultural identification through tribal affiliation or
community recognition.
(e) Women-owned business, a business majority-owned by women,
regardless of race or ethnicity, for purposes of this Chapter when combined with any
other qualifying characteristic listed herein.
(5) "Loan" means a financial obligation made from the fund to an eligible
business pursuant to this Chapter.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of Louisiana Economic Development or
his designee.
§3303. Louisiana Minority Business Development Fund; establishment
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Louisiana Minority Business Development Fund. The fund shall be a revolving loan
fund and shall consist of all of the following:
(1) Monies appropriated by the legislature for deposit into the fund.
(2) Repayments of principal and interest on loans made from the fund.
(3) Fees collected pursuant to this Chapter.
(4) Investment income earned on fund balances.
(5) Gifts, grants, donations, and federal funds designated for deposit into the
fund.
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 829
B. The fund shall be maintained separately from the state general fund.
Monies in the fund shall not revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year
but shall remain available for the purposes of this Chapter.
C. The initial capitalization of the fund shall be twenty-five million dollars,
subject to legislative appropriation.
D. The department may accept and deposit into the fund grants from federal
agencies, private foundations, financial institutions, and other sources for purposes
consistent with this Chapter.
§3304. Loan program; terms, eligibility, and application
A. The department shall administer a direct loan program from the fund.
Loans shall be made available for all of the following eligible purposes:
(1) Working capital.
(2) Equipment and machinery purchase or lease.
(3) Leasehold improvements or build-out costs.
(4) Inventory acquisition.
(5) Technology and software infrastructure.
(6) Business acquisition, if the acquired business continues operations in this
state.
(7) Refinancing of existing high-interest debt, subject to the approval of the
secretary.
B. Loan amounts shall be as follows:
(1) Minimum loan: five thousand dollars.
(2) Maximum loan for businesses in operation less than three years: one
hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(3) Maximum loan for businesses in operation three or more years: five
hundred thousand dollars.
(4) The secretary may, in his discretion, approve loans in excess of the above
maximums not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars for eligible businesses
demonstrating exceptional economic impact potential, subject to written findings.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 829
C. Interest rates shall be set as follows:
(1) Loans of one hundred thousand dollars or less: three percent per annum,
fixed.
(2) Loans of one hundred thousand one dollars to two hundred fifty thousand
dollars: four percent per annum, fixed.
(3) Loans of two hundred fifty thousand one dollars or greater: two percent
below the prime rate as published by the Federal Reserve, not to exceed five percent
per annum.
D. Loan terms shall not exceed fifteen years. The department may grant a
deferred repayment period of up to twenty-four months from the date of
disbursement for eligible businesses that have been in operation for fewer than
thirty-six months.
E. Collateral requirements shall be flexible and shall not disqualify otherwise
eligible applicants solely on the basis of insufficient traditional collateral. The
department may accept any of the following:
(1) Business equipment and inventory.
(2) Accounts receivable.
(3) Personal guarantee.
(4) A lien on projected future contract revenues.
(5) Any combination outlined in this Subsection, with the goal of
maximizing access to capital for eligible businesses.
F.(1) The department shall create a streamlined, plain-language application
process and shall make applications available in digital and paper form.
(2) The department shall render a final decision on a complete application
within sixty calendar days of receipt.
(3) All denials shall be in writing and shall include specific reasons for
denial and a description of the appeals process.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 829
(4) Applicants may appeal adverse decisions to the secretary within thirty
days of denial. The secretary shall issue a written decision within forty-five days of
receiving an appeal.
§3305. Technical assistance and capacity building
A. The department shall reserve not less than ten percent of the Fund's
annual administrative budget for the provision of free or subsidized technical
assistance to loan applicants and recipients, including all of the following:
(1) Financial literacy and bookkeeping training.
(2) Business plan development.
(3) Marketing and customer acquisition assistance.
(4) Assistance obtaining state and federal certifications, including
disadvantaged business enterprise, or DBE, and minority-owned business enterprise,
or MBE, certifications.
(5) Legal and regulatory compliance guidance.
(6) Mentorship pairing with established Louisiana businesses.
B. The department shall partner with the Southern University System,
Grambling State University, Louisiana Community and Technical College System,
and community development financial institutions, or CDFIs, to deliver technical
assistance services.
§3306. Administration; staffing; reporting
A. The department shall employ a minimum of five full-time employees
dedicated to the administration of the fund, including at least one loan officer for
each of the following regions: northern Louisiana, central Louisiana, the New
Orleans metropolitan area, and the Baton Rouge metropolitan area.
B. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later
than February first of each year detailing all of the following:
(1) The total number of loan applications received, approved, denied, and
pending.
(2) The geographic distribution of loans by parish.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 829
(3) The racial and ethnic breakdown of loan recipients.
(4) The industry sector breakdown of loan recipients.
(5) Total loan amounts disbursed and outstanding.
(6) Default rates and loan modification activity.
(7) An assessment of the fund's economic impact, including estimated jobs
created or retained and tax revenue generated.
(8) Recommendations for legislative or programmatic improvements.
C. Administrative expenses of the fund shall not exceed eight percent of the
fund's average annual balance.
§3307. Interagency coordination; federal funds
A. The department shall actively pursue and apply for all applicable federal
grants and matching funds, including but not limited to Small Business
Administration programs, United States Department of the Treasury CDFI programs,
and Economic Development Administration grants, to supplement the fund.
B. The department shall coordinate with the Louisiana Housing Corporation,
the office of financial institutions, and Louisiana Works to ensure alignment of
economic development efforts serving minority communities.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.